Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5837.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-22 of the General Laws entitled "Curriculum [See Title 16
Chapter 97 - The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto the
following section:
16-22-34.1. Instruction in sexual education.
Any school providing instruction in sexual education to students, prior to providing such
instruction to students, shall provide the sexual education curriculum to every parent or legal
guardian that has a child in that school, in a form comprehensible to the parent or legal guardian.
Every parent or legal guardian shall consent, in writing, to the instruction of such sexual education
curriculum provided to that parent or legal guardian for any child in which they are exercising
custodial rights.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001444
========